District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.06

License renewal; failure to renew.

(a)

A nurse staffing agency may obtain renewal of its license from the Department if the nurse staffing agency:

(1)

Meets all licensing requirements as established by this chapter and by regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter; and

(2)

Submits to the Department the renewal licensure fee as established by regulation.

(b)

If a nurse staffing agency fails to obtain renewal of its license, the nurse staffing agency shall, on or before the license expiration date, immediately stop providing and referring nursing personnel, Home Health Aides, and Personal Care Aides to health care facilities, health care agencies, and individuals.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 6, 50 DCR 10914